Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB155.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of June 3, 1937 (P.L.1333, No.320), known as the Pennsylvania Election Code, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1121.1-A. Defects, Disclosure, I nvestigations and Penalties.-- (a) No later than January 1 of every odd- numbered year, each vendor shall file a written disclosure with the department identifying any known defect in an electronic voting system or the fact that there is no known defect, the effect of any defect on the operation and use of the approved electronic 1234567891011121314151617181920212223 voting system and any known corrective measures to cure a defect, including advisories and bulletins issued to electronic voting system users. (b) Implementation of corrective measures approved by the department which enable an electronic voting system to conform to the standards and ensure the timeliness and accuracy of the casting and counting of ballots constitutes a cure of a defect.(c) If a vendor becomes aware of the existence of a defect, the vendor shall file a new disclosure with the department as provided under subsection (a) within thirty days of the date the vendor determined or reasonably should have determined that the defect existed.(d) If a vendor discloses to the department that a defect exists, the department may suspend all sales or leases of the electronic voting system in this Commonwealth and may suspend the use of the electronic voting system in any election in this Commonwealth. The department shall provide written notice of a suspension under this subsection to the affected vendor and county boards of elections. If the department determines that the defect no longer exists, the department shall lift the suspension and provide written notice to each affected vendor and supervisor of elections.(e) If a vendor fails to file a required disclosure for an electronic voting system previously approved by the department, that electronic voting system may not be sold, leased or used for elections in this Commonwealth until the electronic voting system has been submitted for examination and approval under this act. The department shall provide written notice to each county board of elections that the electronic voting system is no longer approved.20250HB0155PN0115 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (f) If the department has reasonable cause to believe an electronic voting system approved under this act contains a defect either before, during or after an election which has not been disclosed under this section, the department shall investigate whether the electronic voting system has a defect.(g) The department shall initiate an investigation on its own initiative or upon the written request of the board of elections of a county that purchased an electronic voting system that contains the alleged defect.(h) Upon initiation of an investigation, the department shall provide written notice to the vendor and each county board of elections.(i) If the department determines by a preponderance of the evidence that a defect exists in the electronic voting system, or that the vendor failed to timely disclose a defect under this section, the department shall provide written notice to the affected vendor and county board of elections.(j) A vendor who receives notice of a defect shall, within ten days of receipt of the notice under subsection (i), file a written response to the department which:(1) denies that the alleged defect exists or existed as alleged by the department or that the vendor failed to timely disclose a defect and provide the reasons for the denial; or(2) admits that the defect exists or existed as alleged by the department or that the vendor failed to timely disclose a defect.(k) If the defect has been cured, the vendor shall provide an explanation of how the defect was cured.(l) If the defect has not been cured, the vendor shall inform the department whether the defect can be cured and shall 20250HB0155PN0115 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 provide the department with a plan for curing the defect.(m) If the defect can be cured, the department shall establish a time frame within which to cure the defect.(n) If, after receiving a response from the vendor, the department determines that a defect does not exist or has been cured within the time frame established by the department, the department shall take no further action.(o) If the department determines that a vendor failed to timely disclose a defect or that a defect exists and a vendor has not filed a written response or has failed to cure within the time frame established by the department, or if the defect cannot be cured, the department shall impose a civil penalty of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) for the defect plus an amount equal to the actual costs incurred by the department in conducting the investigation.(p) (1) If the department finds that a defect existed, the department may suspend all sales and leases of the electronic voting system and may suspend its use in any county in this Commonwealth. The department shall provide written notice of the suspension to each affected vendor and county board of elections.(2) If the department determines that a defect no longer exists in an electronic voting system that has been suspended from use under this section, the department shall lift the suspension and authorize the sale, lease and use of the electronic voting system in any election in this Commonwealth. The department shall provide written notice that the suspension has been lifted to each affected vendor and county board of elections.(3) If the department finds that a defect existed and the 20250HB0155PN0115 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 defect cannot be cured, the department may disapprove the electronic voting system for use in elections in this Commonwealth. The department shall provide written notice to all county boards of elections that the electronic voting system is no longer approved. After approval of an electronic voting system has been withdrawn under this paragraph, the electronic voting system may not be sold, leased or used in this Commonwealth until it has been resubmitted for examination and approval and adopted for use under this act.(4) A vendor for whom a civil penalty was imposed under this section may not submit an electronic voting system for approval by the department or enter into a contract for sale or lease of an electronic voting system in this Commonwealth until each civil penalty has been paid and the department provides written confirmation of the payment to the county board of elections.(q) The department shall prepare a written report of any investigation conducted under this section and submit the report to the President pro tempore of the Senate, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, the Majority Leader and Minority Leader of the Senate, the Majority Leader and Minority Leader of the House of Representatives, the chair and minority chair of the State Government Committee of the Senate and the chair and minority chair of the State Government Committee of the House of Representatives.(r) The authority of the department under this section shall be in addition to, and not exclusive of, any other authority provided by law.(s) For the purposes of this section: "Defect" means a failure, fault or flaw in an electronic or electro-mechanical electronic voting system approved under this 20250HB0155PN0115 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 act, which results in nonconformance with the standards in a manner that affects the timeliness or accuracy of the casting or counting of ballots or a failure or inability of the electronic voting system manufacturer or vendor to make available and provide approved replacements of hardware or software to the counties that have purchased the approved electronic voting system, the unavailability of which results in the electronic voting system's nonconformance with the standards in a manner that affects the timeliness or accuracy of the casting or counting of ballots."Department" means the Department of State of the Commonwealth.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0155PN0115 - 6 - 12345678910111213